Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-3902
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the
Indoor Tanning Facility Act:

(1) Board means
the Board of Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body
Art;

(2)
Department means the Division of Public Health of the Department of Health
and Human Services;

(3) Operator means a person designated by the tanning facility owner
or tanning equipment lessee to operate, or to assist and instruct in the operation
and use of, the tanning facility or tanning equipment;

(4) Tanning
equipment means any device that emits electromagnetic radiation with wavelengths
in the air between two hundred nanometers and four hundred nanometers and
that is used for tanning of the skin. Tanning equipment includes, but is not
limited to, a sunlamp, tanning booth, or tanning bed; and

(5) Tanning
facility means a location, place, area, structure, or business that provides
access to tanning equipment. Tanning facility includes, but is not limited
to, any tanning business, salon, health club, apartment, or condominium, which
has tanning equipment that is made available for public or commercial use,
regardless of whether a fee is charged for access to the tanning equipment.

Laws 2014, LB132, § 2.
July 18, 2014